ctranslate-ol/frontend/dictionaries/dsb_DE.dic
Hurazk/51
Kólsk/51
Kórnack/51
Kózl/1,50
Lažk/1,52
Małk/53
Małušk/51
Mjałk/51
Sint/1,58
Sušk/53
Tock/51
Wšelak/51
alujabr/1,48
blarj/1,59
blidarj/1,65
bujn/1,68
bytšn/1,68
bědn/1,68
błomjenj/1,47
bź/1,54
carn/1,68
casnikarj/1,65
ceptarj/1,65
cerwj/1,61
cerwjen/1,68
cerwjenj/1,47
chamn/1,64
chrop/67
chwatn/1,64
cop/67
cołnarj/1,65
danj/1,47
diakonisk/1,46
dl/55
doglědn/1,64
dopowě/56
dopowěs/1,62
dosegn/1,64
dozjěs/1,62
drob/67
drog/1,46
dukl/1,54
dym/67
flinkn/1,64
fryšn/1,68
gjarb/67
glucn/1,68
gribarj/1,65
górk/1,46
góspodarj/1,65
góńtwarj/1,65
głažan/1,68
głodn/1,64
jachl/1,54
jagarj/1,65
jagnj/1,59
jasn/1,68
jě/56
jěs/1,62
jěsn/1,68
kamjenj/1,61
kelnarj/1,65
kibl/1,54
kjacarj/1,65
kjarcmarj/1,65
kjarm/67
kjawc/42
klempnarj/1,65
kludn/1,64
kmjenj/1,61
konfetij/1,57
kop/67
kringl/1,54
kul/39
kularj/1,61
kurj/1,61
kuźerj/1,61
kwic/41
kóln/1,68
kón/1,49
kórc/41
kórjenj/1,61
kótłarj/1,65
kšasn/1,68
kšocenj/1,47
kšušwick/1,46
lasn/1,68
lubk/1,46
lětn/1,68
mazl/1,54
mazn/1,64
miln/1,68
mjenj/1,47
mucn/1,68
mudr/1,68
mutn/1,68
mócn/1,68
módl/1,54
módr/1,68
mólarj/1,65
mórj/1,59
nadpadn/1,64
najm/63
najěs/1,62
napšaw/40
nawě/56
nawěs/1,62
nałdž/1,43
njebruml/1,54
njecerwjenj/1,47
njecesl/1,54
njechruchl/1,54
njechwatn/1,64
njedanj/1,47
njedojěs/1,62
njedopowě/56
njedopowěs/1,62
njedosegn/1,64
njedozjěs/1,62
njeglucn/1,68
njegnerl/1,54
njegrynšl/1,54
njejachl/1,54
njejě/56
njejěs/1,62
njekawl/1,54
njekjachl/1,54
njekringl/1,54
njekózl/1,54
njekšocenj/1,47
njemudr/1,68
njemuml/1,54
njeměkl/1,54
njenadpadn/1,64
njenajěs/1,62
njenawě/56
njenawěs/1,62
njenałdž/1,43
njenužl/1,54
njepisan/1,68
njepisanj/1,47
njepowě/56
njepowěs/1,62
njepołn/1,68
njepreml/1,54
njepójěs/1,62
njepśedpowě/56
njepśedpowěs/1,62
njepśeglědn/1,64
njepśejěs/1,62
njepśekusn/1,64
njepśijěs/1,62
njepśipowě/56
njepśipowěs/1,62
njepśistupn/1,68
njepśiłdž/1,43
njereml/1,54
njerozjěs/1,62
njerozpowě/56
njerozpowěs/1,62
njeskiwl/1,54
njeskludn/1,64
njeskobodn/1,68
njesmarcl/1,54
njespjerchl/1,54
njespowě/56
njespowěs/1,62
njespór/1,68
njestrowj/1,47
njetendl/1,54
njetucn/1,68
njetśawl/1,54
njetšodl/1,54
njewargl/1,54
njewiś/60
njewobełdž/1,43
njewobglědn/1,64
njewobjěs/1,62
njewochl/1,54
njewopowě/56
njewopowěs/1,62
njewugasn/1,64
njewujěs/1,62
njewupowě/56
njewupowěs/1,62
njewurjakn/1,64
njewułdž/1,43
njewójěs/1,62
njewótdrapn/1,64
njewótełdž/1,43
njewótjěs/1,62
njewótpowě/56
njewótpowěs/1,62
njewózełdž/1,43
njewě/56
njewěs/1,62
njezagasn/1,64
njezajm/63
njezajěs/1,62
njezapowě/56
njezapowěs/1,62
njezbóžn/1,68
njezełdž/1,43
njezgibn/1,64
njezjěs/1,62
njełdž/1,43
njeśopl/1,54
nješmyrl/1,54
nješybl/1,54
nježrědl/1,54
nježwankl/1,54
nužl/1,54
něcej/1,44
někak/45
panjekón/1,49
pastyrj/1,61
pcołkarj/1,65
pisan/1,68
pisanj/1,47
piwarj/1,65
pjeprj/1,61
plišć/66
powě/56
powěs/1,62
połn/1,68
promjenj/1,47
puchorj/1,61
pyšn/1,68
pódkup/40
pójěs/1,62
pólodn/1,68
pówok/1,58
późiwn/1,64
pław/67
płomjenj/1,47
pśedpowě/56
pśedpowěs/1,62
pśejěs/1,62
pśekipn/1,64
pśibližn/1,64
pśijěs/1,62
pśiklapn/1,64
pśipadn/1,64
pśipowě/56
pśipowěs/1,62
pśipšaw/40
pśiłdž/1,43
pšosarj/1,65
reml/1,54
rozdźěrn/1,64
rozjěs/1,62
rozpowě/56
rozpowěs/1,62
rozpšaw/40
rozraz/41
rozšćěpn/1,64
rucnikarj/1,65
rybarj/1,65
ryjn/1,68
samk/1,46
samodrug/1,46
san/1,49
sedn/1,64
semjenj/1,47
skjawl/1,54
skludn/1,64
skobodn/1,68
spjerchl/1,54
spokojn/1,68
spowě/56
spowěs/1,62
spěšn/1,68
stysn/1,64
swarj/1,61
sćerpn/1,64
tendl/1,54
tešn/1,68
top/67
tužn/1,68
twórj/1,61
tyšarj/1,65
tšochl/1,54
warj/1,59
wawrj/1,59
wiś/60
wjergl/1,54
wobełdž/1,43
wobrubn/1,64
wobwjertn/1,64
woklep/67
wopowě/56
wopowěs/1,62
wuběrn/1,64
wupowě/56
wupowěs/1,62
wurězn/1,64
wuzbytn/1,64
wułdž/1,43
wótbydn/1,64
wótełdž/1,43
wótjěs/1,62
wótpowě/56
wótśisn/1,64
wózełdž/1,43
wě/56
wěs/1,62
włožn/1,68
zajm/63
zakśiw/40
zamkarj/1,65
zamól/39
zapadn/1,64
zapowě/56
zapowěs/1,62
zarz/41
zasedn/1,64
zaštapn/1,64
zbóžn/1,68
zełdž/1,43
zgibn/1,64
zgub/40
zub/67
zwjertn/1,64
zwónarj/1,61
Ładk/53
łacn/1,68
łom/67
śerl/1,54
śišć/66
śěsn/1,68
šepjerj/1,61
šeršenj/1,61
šlap/40
šlodarj/1,65
štapn/1,64
šularj/1,65
šum/67
šuml/1,54
šwic/41
šwjerc/41
šćan/1,68
šćanj/1,47
šćerc/41
šćerj/1,61
šćěrj/1,61
źur/1,49
žeńsk/1,46
žuml/1,54
žłob/67
